Utah statutes.
16-6a-1517.   Appeal from revocation.
If the division revokes the authority of a foreign nonprofit corporation to
conduct affairs in this state, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 4,
Administrative Procedures Act, the following may appeal the refusal to the
executive director:
(1)  the foreign nonprofit corporation; or
(2)  the representative of the foreign nonprofit corporation.
